src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-gaojkes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - gåjkes: # 
    gåjkes+A+Attr: gåjjke

    gåjkes+A+Sg+Nom: gåjkes
    gåjkes+A+Pl+Nom: gåjjkása

#    gåjkes+A+Sg+Gen: gåjjkása
#    gåjkes+A+Sg+Acc: gåjjkásav
#    gåjkes+A+Sg+Ill: gåjjkásij
#    gåjkes+A+Sg+Ine: gåjjkásin
#    gåjkes+A+Sg+Ela: [gåjjkásist, gåjjkásis]
#    gåjkes+A+Sg+Com: gåjjkásijn
#    gåjkes+A+Pl+Gen: gåjjkásij
#    gåjkes+A+Pl+Acc: gåjjkásijd
#    gåjkes+A+Pl+Ill: gåjjkásijda
#    gåjkes+A+Pl+Ine: gåjjkásijn
#    gåjkes+A+Pl+Ela: [gåjjkásijst, gåjjkásijs]
#    gåjkes+A+Pl+Com: [gåjjkásij, gåjjkásijgum]
##    gåjkes+A+Ess: gåjjkásan

    gåjkes+A+Comp+Attr: gåjjkáp

    gåjkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gåjjkáp
    gåjkes+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [gåjjkába, gåjjkábo]

    gåjkes+A+Superl+Attr: gåjjkájmus

    gåjkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gåjjkájmus
    gåjkes+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: gåjjkájmusa

#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: gåjjkásubmusa
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: gåjjkásubmusav
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: gåjjkásubmusij
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: gåjjkásubmusin
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [gåjjkásubmusist, gåjjkásubmusis]
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Sg+Com: gåjjkásubmusijn
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: gåjjkásubmusij
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: gåjjkásubmusijd
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: gåjjkásubmusijda
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: gåjjkásubmusijn
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [gåjjkásubmusijst, gåjjkásubmusijs]
#    gåjkes+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [gåjjkásubmusij, gåjjkásubmusijgum]
##    gåjkes+A+Superl+Ess: gåjjkásubmusan
